Wisconsin, session 2025, AB573.
do enact as follows:AB573,13Section 1. 949.20 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB573,2,104949.20 (3) “Examination costs” means the costs of an examination that is done 1to gather evidence regarding a sex offense,; any procedure during that examination 2process that tests for or prevents a sexually transmitted disease,; a prophylaxis 3provided or prescribed, during that examination process, that reduces the risk of or 4prevents human immunodeficiency virus if the person performing the examination 5or procedure believes that exposure to human immunodeficiency virus could be a 6consequence of the sex offense; and any medication provided or prescribed, during 7that examination process, that prevents or treats a sexually transmitted disease 8that the person performing the examination or procedure believes could be a 9consequence of the sex offense. “Examination costs” does not include any processing 10or administrative costs, attorney fees, or other expenses.AB573,211Section 2. 949.24 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:AB573,2,2012949.24 (3) Medical records. An applicant shall submit to the department 13reports from any physician, physician’s assistant, or nurse who treated or examined 14the victim to gather evidence regarding a sex offense, performed any procedure 15during that treatment or examination that tests for or prevents a sexually 16transmitted disease, provided or prescribed a prophylaxis, or provided or prescribed 17any medication to prevent or treat a sexually transmitted disease. The applicant 18may not submit to the department any other records than those pertaining to the 19examination, treatment, procedure, prophylaxis, or medication for which the 20applicant is seeking an award.AB573,2,2121